Utah statutes.
49-16-502.   Death of active member in Division B -- Payment of benefits.
(1)  If an active member of this system enrolled in Division B under Section
49-16-301 dies, benefits are payable as follows:
(a)  If the death is classified by the office as a line-of-duty death,
benefits are payable as follows:
(i)  If the member has accrued less than 20 years of firefighter service
credit, the spouse at the time of death shall receive a lump sum of $1,500 and
an allowance equal to 37.5% of the member's final average monthly salary.
(ii)  If the member has accrued 20 or more years of firefighter service
credit, the member shall be considered to have retired with an allowance
calculated under Subsection 49-16-402 and the spouse at the time of death
shall receive the death benefit payable to a spouse under Section 49-16-504.
(b)  If the death is not classified by the office as a line-of-duty death, the
benefits are payable as follows:
(i)  If the member has accrued five or more years of firefighter service
credit, the death is considered line-of-duty and the same benefits are payable
as established under Subsection (1)(a).
(ii)  If the member has accrued less than five years of firefighter service
credit, the spouse at the time of death shall receive a refund of the member's
contributions, plus 50% of the member's most recent 12 months compensation.
(c)  If the member has accrued five or more years of firefighter service
credit, the member's unmarried children until they reach age 21 or dependent
unmarried mentally or physically disabled children, shall receive a monthly
allowance of $75.
(2) (a)  In the event of the death of the member and spouse, the spouse's
benefits are equally divided and paid to each unmarried child until the child
reaches age 21.
(b)  The payments shall be made to the surviving parent or duly appointed
guardian or as provided under Sections 49-11-609 and 49-11-610.
(3)  If a benefit is not distributed under the previous subsections, and the
member has designated a beneficiary, the member's  member contributions shall
be paid to the beneficiary.
(4)  The combined monthly payments made to the beneficiaries of any member
under this section may not exceed 75% of the member's final average monthly
salary.
